Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.155.010

Purpose.

It is the purpose of RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.160, 28A.160.030, and 28A.150.390 to ensure that all children with disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020 shall have the opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense as guaranteed to them by the Constitution of this state and applicable federal laws.

[ 2007 c 115 s 1; 1995 c 77 s 7; 1990 c 33 s 120; 1971 ex.s. c 66 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.13.005.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 66: "If any provision of this 1971 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1971 ex.s. c 66 s 13.]

Effective date—1971 ex.s. c 66: "This 1971 amendatory act will take effect July 1, 1973." [ 1971 ex.s. c 66 s 14.]